District of Columbia statutes.
42-3403.08

Information and technical assistance.

The Mayor shall establish an office to coordinate programs of technical assistance and serve as a central clearinghouse for information needed by tenants regarding the conversion and sale of rental housing. Program areas for this office include, but are not limited to, counseling, subsidy programs, relocation services, housing purchase and rehabilitation finance, tax relief programs, and technical assistance for the formation of tenant organizations, purchase of housing accommodations, rehabilitation, and conversion to cooperative or condominium.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 308, 27 DCR 2975

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1627.

Editor's Notes

Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.